Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.39.010

Legislative and administrative records.

Every code city shall keep a journal of minutes of its legislative meetings with orders, resolutions and ordinances passed, and records of the proceedings of any city department, division or commission performing quasi-judicial functions as required by ordinances of the city and general laws of the state and shall keep such records open to the public as required by RCW 42.30.035 and shall keep and preserve all public records and publications or reproduce and destroy the same as provided by Title 40 RCW. Each code city may duplicate and sell copies of its ordinances at fees reasonably calculated to defray the cost of such duplication and handling.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 32; 1995 c 21 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.39.010.]